Mississippi, session 2026, HB456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-15-26, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-15-26.  (1)  (a)  In all criminal cases, felony and misdemeanor, other than crimes against the person, a crime of violence as defined in Section 97-3-2, a violation of Section 97-11-31, or crimes in which a person unlawfully takes, obtains or misappropriates funds received by or entrusted to the person by virtue of his or her public office or employment, the circuit or county court shall be empowered, upon the entry of a plea of guilty by a criminal defendant made on or after July 1, 2014, to withhold acceptance of the plea and sentence thereon pending successful completion of such conditions as may be imposed by the court pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. (b)  In all misdemeanor criminal cases, other than crimes against the person, the justice or municipal court shall be empowered, upon the entry of a plea of guilty by a criminal defendant, to withhold acceptance of the plea and sentence thereon pending successful completion of such conditions as may be imposed by the court pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. (c)  Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), in all criminal cases charging a misdemeanor of domestic violence as defined in Section 99-3-7(5), a circuit, county, justice or municipal court shall be empowered, upon the entry of a plea of guilty by the criminal defendant, to withhold acceptance of the plea and sentence thereon pending successful completion of such conditions as may be imposed by the court pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. (d)  No person having previously qualified under the provisions of this section shall be eligible to qualify for release in accordance with this section for a repeat offense.  A person shall not be eligible to qualify for release in accordance with this section if charged with the offense of trafficking of a controlled substance as provided in Section 41-29-139(f) or if charged with an offense under the Mississippi Implied Consent Law.  Violations under the Mississippi Implied Consent Law can only be nonadjudicated under the provisions of Section 63-11-30. (2)  (a)  Conditions which the circuit, county, justice or municipal court may impose under subsection (1) of this section shall consist of: (i)  Reasonable restitution to the victim of the crime. (ii)  Performance of not more than nine hundred sixty (960) hours of public service work approved by the court. (iii)  Payment of a fine not to exceed the statutory limit. (iv)  Successful completion of drug, alcohol, psychological or psychiatric treatment, successful completion of a program designed to bring about the cessation of domestic abuse, or any combination thereof, if the court deems treatment necessary. (v)  The circuit or county court, in its discretion, may require the defendant to remain in the program subject to good behavior for a period of time not to exceed five (5) years.  The justice or municipal court, in its discretion, may require the defendant to remain in the program subject to good behavior for a period of time not to exceed two (2) years. (b)  Conditions which the circuit or county court may impose under subsection (1) of this section also include successful completion of an effective evidence-based program or a properly controlled pilot study designed to contribute to the evidence-based research literature on programs targeted at reducing recidivism.  Such program or pilot study may be community based or institutionally based and should address risk factors identified in a formal assessment of the offender's risks and needs. (3)  When the court has imposed upon the defendant the conditions set out in this section, the court shall release the bail bond, if any. (4)  Upon successful completion of the court-imposed conditions permitted by subsection (2) of this section, the court shall direct that the cause be dismissed and the case be closed. (5)  * * *Upon petition therefor, The court shall immediately expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial. SECTION 2.  Section 99-15-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-15-59.  The court shall automatically expunge the record of any person who is arrested, issued a citation, or held for any misdemeanor and not formally charged or prosecuted with an offense within twelve (12) months of arrest, or upon dismissal of the charge * * *, may apply to the court with jurisdiction over the matter for the charges to be expunged. SECTION 3.  Section 45-27-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-27-9.  (1)  All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center an arrest card that will transmit fingerprints, descriptions, photographs (when specifically requested), and other identifying data on persons who have been lawfully arrested or taken into custody in this state for all felonies and misdemeanors as described in Section 45-27-7(2)(a).  It shall be the duty of all chiefs of police, sheriffs, district attorneys, courts, court clerks, judges, parole and probation officers, wardens or other persons in charge of correctional institutions in this state to furnish the center with all data required by the rules duly promulgated under the Administrative Procedures Act to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, and the duty of courts and court clerks to submit a disposition form for every disposition.  It shall be the duty of all criminal justice agencies within the state to supply the prosecutor and the proper court with the disposition form that is attached to the physical arrest card if fingerprints were taken manually or, if fingerprints were captured digitally, the disposition form generated by the electronic fingerprint device at the time of the arrest.  The PEER committee may conduct random review of the records of any agency or clerks referenced in this subsection (1) to determine whether the duties of such agencies and clerks are being fulfilled in a timely manner.  The PEER committee, based on its findings, if any, shall recommend measures to ensure that the duties are more effectively carried out in a timely manner. (2)  (a)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall obtain, or cause to be obtained, fingerprints according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, full face and profile photographs (if equipment is available) and other available identifying data, of each person arrested or taken into custody for an offense of a type designated in subsection (1) of this section, of all persons arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice and of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions, but photographs need not be taken if it is known that photographs of the type listed, taken within the previous year, are on file. Any record taken in connection with any person arrested or taken into custody and subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense through court proceedings shall be purged from the files of the center and destroyed upon receipt by the center of a lawful expunction order.  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrests or takings into custody which result in release without charge or subsequent exoneration from criminal liability within twenty-four (24) hours of the release or exoneration. (b)  The center will work to secure grant funds to purchase live scan equipment to be utilized throughout the state.  All law enforcement agencies shall utilize any live scan equipment provided by the center to ensure the most accurate collection of fingerprints. The center shall coordinate the use of the equipment with federal, state, county and municipal law enforcement agencies. (3)  Fingerprints and other identifying data required to be taken under subsection (2) shall be forwarded within twenty-four (24) hours after taking for filing and classification, but the period of twenty-four (24) hours may be extended to cover any intervening holiday or weekend.  Photographs taken shall be forwarded at the discretion of the agency concerned, but, if not forwarded, the fingerprint record shall be marked "Photo Available" and the photographs shall be forwarded subsequently if the center so requests. (4)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrest warrants and related identifying data immediately upon determination of the fact that the warrant cannot be served for the reasons stated.  If the warrant is subsequently served or withdrawn, the law enforcement agency concerned must immediately notify the center of the service or withdrawal. Also, the agency concerned must annually, no later than January 31 of each year and at other times if requested by the center, confirm all arrest warrants which continue to be outstanding.  Upon receipt of a lawful expunction order, the center shall purge and destroy files of all data relating to an offense when an individual is subsequently exonerated from criminal liability of that offense.  The center shall not be liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge any records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (5)  All persons in charge of state correctional institutions shall obtain fingerprints, according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise directed by the center, and full face and profile photographs of all persons received on commitment to the institutions.  The prints so taken shall be forwarded to the center, together with any other identifying data requested, within ten (10) days after the arrival at the institution of the person committed.  At the time of release, the institution will again obtain fingerprints, as before, and forward them to the center within ten (10) days, along with any other related information requested by the center.  The institution shall notify the center immediately upon the release of the person. (6)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies, all court clerks, all municipal justices where they have no clerks, all justice court judges and all persons in charge of state and county probation and parole offices, shall supply the center with the information described in subsections (4) and (10) of this section on the basis of the forms and instructions for the disposition form to be supplied by the center. (7)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies in this state shall furnish the center with any other identifying data required in accordance with guidelines established by the center.  All law enforcement agencies and correctional institutions in this state having criminal identification files shall cooperate in providing the center with copies of the items in the files which will aid in establishing the nucleus of the state criminal identification file. (8)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall report to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, all persons wanted by and all vehicles and identifiable property stolen from their jurisdictions.  The report shall be made as soon as is practical after the investigating department or agency either ascertains that a vehicle or identifiable property has been stolen or obtains a warrant for an individual's arrest or determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the individual has committed a crime.  The report shall be made within a reasonable time period following the reporting department's or agency's determination that it has grounds to believe that a vehicle or property was stolen or that the wanted person should be arrested. (9)  All law enforcement agencies in the state shall immediately notify the center if at any time after making a report as required by subsection (8) of this section it is determined by the reporting department or agency that a person is no longer wanted or that a vehicle or property stolen has been recovered.  Furthermore, if the agency making the apprehension or recovery is not the one which made the original report, then it shall immediately notify the originating agency of the full particulars relating to the apprehension or recovery using methods prescribed by the center. (10)  (a)  All law enforcement agencies in the state and clerks of the various courts shall promptly report to the center all instances where records of convictions of criminals are ordered expunged by courts of this state as now provided by law. The center shall promptly expunge from the files of the center and destroy all records pertaining to any convictions that are ordered expunged by the courts of this state as provided by law. (b)  All law enforcement agencies in the state and clerks of the various courts shall promptly report to the center all expungements of instances in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial.  The center shall promptly expunge from the files of the center and destroy all records pertaining to any such instances. (11)  The center shall not be held liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (12)  Any criminal justice department or agency making an expenditure in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year on software or programming upgrades concerning a computerized records management system or jail management system shall ensure that the new or upgraded system is formatted to Department of Justice approved XML format and that no impediments to data sharing with other agencies or departments exist in the software programming. (13)  (a)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall: (i)  Implement an incident-based reporting system within the agency or department that meets the reporting requirements of the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation; (ii)  Use the system described by subparagraph (i) to submit to the center information and statistics concerning criminal offenses committed in the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency, in a manner prescribed by the center; and (iii)  Report the information as soon as is practicable after the investigating agency or department ascertains that a qualifying crime has been committed in its jurisdiction, once the state-level NIBRS Repository is available. (b)  No later than December 31, 2025, state and local law enforcement agencies shall be compliant with all regulations promulgated by the Department of Public Safety's Criminal Information Center (CIC), with consultation with the President of the Sheriffs Association and Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police with regard to the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. SECTION 4.  Section 45-27-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-27-5.  (1)  There is hereby established within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety a system for the communication of vital information relating to crimes, criminals and criminal activity to be known as the Mississippi Justice Information Center. Central responsibility for the development, maintenance and operation of the center shall be vested with the Director of the Mississippi Justice Information Center. (2)  The director of the center shall maintain the necessary staff to enable the effective and efficient performance of the duties and responsibilities ascribed to the center.  Such staff shall include but not be limited to statistical analysis personnel and field monitoring personnel, along with the support services to be procured within state government. (3)  All personnel of the center shall be subject to approval by the State Personnel Board, with due recognition to be given to the special qualifications and availability of the types of individuals required for such employment. SECTION 5.  Section 45-27-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-27-21.  A certified copy of every expunction and nonadjudication order shall be sent by the circuit clerk to the Mississippi Criminal Information Center where it shall be maintained in a separate confidential database accessible only upon written request by a district attorney, a county prosecuting attorney, a municipal court prosecuting attorney, the Attorney General of Mississippi and the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board.  Any criminal conviction which has been expunged or nonadjudicated may be used for the purpose of determining habitual offender status and for the use of the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board in giving or retaining law enforcement certification, and to ensure that a person is only eligible for first-offender status one (1) time. SECTION 6.  Section 99-19-72, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 99-19-72.  (1)  A filing fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) is hereby levied on each petition to expunge an offense under Section 99-19-71 to be collected by the circuit clerk and distributed as follows: (a)  One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to be deposited into the Judicial System Operation Fund; (b)  Forty Dollars ($40.00) to be deposited into the District Attorneys Operation Fund; and (c)  Ten Dollars ($10.00) to be retained by the circuit clerk collecting the fee for administration purposes. (2)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of district attorneys shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer, and charges and fees authorized by paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall be retained by the circuit clerks for expenditures authorized by law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.